zh-TW: 底片/幻燈片儲存類型: 檔案收納盒; 活頁夾; 信封; 檔案; 防護套; 滑動式活頁夾; 滑動式盒子; 滑動式傳送帶; 滑動式文件; 滑動式儲存頁面; 滑動式文件盤; 其他
pt-PT: Tipo de armazenamento de negativo/slide: Caixa de arquivo; Capa de negativo; Envelope de negativo; Ficheiro de negativo; Mangas negativas; Capa de slides; Caixa de slides; Carrossel de slides; Ficheiro de slides; Páginas de armazenamento; Bandeja de slides; Outro
sv: Förvaring av negativ och diabilder: Arkivförvaringslåda; Negativpärm; Negativkuvert; Negativarkiv; Negativfickor; Diabildspärm; Diabildslåda; Diabildskarusell; Diabildsarkiv; Diabildsförvaringsblad; Diabildsbricka; Övrigt
tr: Negatif/Slayt depolama türü: Arşiv saklama kutusu; Negatif bağlayıcı; Negatif zarf; Negatif dosya; Negatif kılıflar; Slayt bağlayıcı; Slayt kutusu; Slayt taşıyıcı; Slayt dosyası; Slayt depolama sayfaları; Slayt tepsisi; Diğer
da: Opbevaringstype af negativer og dias: Arkivopbevaringsboks; Negativt ringbind; Negativ konvolut; Negativ fil; Negative ærmer; Skyderingbind; Skydekasse; Skydekarrusel; Skydefil; Skydelagringssider; Skydebakke; Andet
ro-RO: Tip de stocare negativ/diapozitiv: Cutie de depozitare a arhivei; Mapă pentru negative; Plic pentru negative; Fișier cu negative; Folie de protecție pentru negative; Mapă pentru diapozitive; Cutie pentru diapozitive; Carusel pentru diapozitive; Fișier cu diapozitive; Folie de protecție diapozitive; Tavă pentru diapozitive; Altele
es: Tipo de almacenamiento de negativos/diapositivas: Caja de almacenamiento de archivos; Carpeta para negativos; Sobre para negativos; Archivo para negativos; Fundas para negativos; Carpeta para diapositivas; Caja para diapositivas; Carrusel para diapositivas; Archivo para diapositivas; Páginas de almacenamiento para diapositivas; Bandeja para diapositivas; Otros
nb: Lagringstype for negativer/lysbilder: Arkivoppbevaringsboks; Negativperm; Negativkonvolutt; Negativfil; Negative ermer; Skyveperm; Skyveboks; Skyvekarusell; Skyvefil; Skyvelagringssider; Skyveskuff; Annet
ru: Тип хранения негативов/слайдов: Архивный ящик для хранения; Папка для негативов; Конверт для негативов; Файл для негативов; Рукава для негативов; Папка для слайдов; Коробка для слайдов; Карусель для слайдов; Файл для слайдов; Страницы хранения слайдов; Лоток для слайдов; Другое
cs: Typ ukládání negativů a snímků: Archivní úložná schránka; Pořadač na negativy; Obálka na negativy; Složka na negativy; Pouzdra na negativy; Pořadač na diapozitivy; Box na diapozitivy; Karusel na diapozitivy; Složka na diapozitivy; Stránky pro ukládání snímků; Zásobník na diapozitivy; Jiné
lt-LT: Negatyvų ir skaidrių laikymo tipas: Archyvavimo dėžutė; Negatyvinių juostelių segtuvas; Negatyvinių juostelių vokas; Negatyvinių juostelių failas; Negatyvinių juostelių aplankai; Skaidrių segtuvas; Skaidrių dėžutė; Skaidrių projektorius; Skaidrių failas; Skaidrių saugojimo puslapiai; Skaidrių dėklas; Kita
vi: Loại lưu trữ âm bản/bản kính dương: Hộp lưu trữ nhập; Gáy còng sắt; Lưu trữ âm bản; Tệp âm bản; Vỏ chụp âm film; Nẹp rãnh; Hộp van trượt; Slide truyền động; Tệp slide; Trang lưu trữ trình chiếu; Kéo slide; Khác
en: Negative/Slide storage type: Archive storage box; Negative binder; Negative envelope; Negative file; Negative sleeves; Slide binder; Slide box; Slide carousel; Slide file; Slide storage pages; Slide tray; Other
fr: Type de stockage des négatifs/diapositives: Boîte de stockage d’archives; Classeur négatif; Enveloppe négative; Fichier négatif; Manchons négatifs; Classeur à diapositive; Boîte à diapositive; Carrousel de diapositives; Fichier de diapositives; Pages de stockage de diapositives; Bac à glissière; Autre
hr-HR: Vrsta pohrane negativa/dijapozitiva: Kutija za arhiviranje; Album za negative; Negativna omotnica; Traka negativa; Košuljice za negative; Album za dijapozitive; Kutija za dijapozitive; Vrtuljak za dijapozitive; Datoteka dijapozitiva; Stranice za pohranu dijapozitiva; Podložak za dijapozitive; Ostalo
bg-BG: Тип съхранение на негатив/диапозитив: Кутия за съхранение на архиви; Класьор за негативи; Плик за негативи; Папка за негативи; Калъфи за негативи; Класьор за диапозитиви; Кутия за диапозитиви; Въртележка за диапозитиви; Папка за диапозитиви; Страници за съхранение на диапозитиви; Поставка за диапозитиви; Други
fi: Negatiivien ja diojen säilytystapa: Arkiston säilytyslaatikko; Negatiivikansio; Negatiivien kirjekuori; Negatiivitiedosto; Negatiivitaskut; Diakansio; Dialaatikko; Diakaruselli; Diatiedosto; Diojen tallennussivut; Dialokero; Muu
de: Aufbewahrungsart der Negative/Dias: Archiv-Aufbewahrungsbox; Negativ-Ordner; Negativumschlag; Negativakte; Negativhüllen; Dia-Aktenordner; Dia-Box; Dia-Karussell; Dia-Akte; Dia-Aufbewahrungsseiten; Dia-Ablage; Sonstiges
it: Tipo di conservazione di negativi e lastre: Contenitore di archiviazione; Raccoglitore per negativi; Busta per negativi; File dei negativi; Custodie negative; Raccoglitore di diapositive; Scatola di diapositive; Carosello di diapositive; File di diapositive; Pagine di archiviazione delle diapositive; Vassoio per diapositive; Altro
pt-BR: Tipo de armazenamento de negativo/slide: Caixa de armazenamento de arquivo; Fichário para negativo; Envelope para negativos; Arquivo para negativos; Porta-negativos; Clipe de haste para pasta; Caixa para slides; Carrossel de slide; Arquivo de slide; Páginas de armazenamento de slides; Bandeja para slide; Outro
ko: 네거티브 사진/슬라이드 보관함 유형: 아카이브 보관함; 네거티브 바인더; 네거티브 봉투; 네거티브 파일; 네거티브 슬리브; 슬라이드 바인더; 슬라이드 박스; 슬라이드 캐러셀; 슬라이드 파일; 슬라이드 저장소 페이지; 슬라이드 트레이; 기타
th: ประเภทที่เก็บฟิล์มและสไลด์: กล่องเก็บระยะยาว; แฟ้มสันห่วงใส่ฟิล์มเนกาทีฟ; ซองจดหมายใส่ฟิล์มเนกาทีฟ; แฟ้มเจาะรูใส่ฟิล์มเนกาทีฟ; ซองใสใส่ฟิล์มเนกาทีฟ; แฟ้มสไลด์พลาสติก; กล่องใส่สไลด์; โปรเจกเตอร์สไลด์แบบหมุน; แฟ้มใส่สไลด์; ซองจัดเก็บสไลด์; ถาดใส่สไลด์; อื่นๆ
sl-SI: Vrsta shranjevanja negativa/diapozitiva: Arhivska škatla za shranjevanje; Fascikel za negative; Ovojnica za negative; Mapa za negative; Prešita mapa za negative; Fascikel za diapozitive; Škatla za diapozitive; Galerija za diapozitive; Datoteka za diapozitive; Strani za shranjevanje diapozitivov; Pladenj za diapozitive; Drugo
nl: Type opslag negatief/dia: Archiefopslagdoos; Negatief bindmiddel; Negatieve envelop; Negatief bestand; Negatieve sleeves; Diabinder; Diadoos; Diacarrousel; Diabestand; Dia-opslagpagina's; Diatray; Andere
pl: Typ przechowywania negatywów/slajdów: Pudełko do przechowywania archiwum; Binder do negatywów; Koperta na negatywy; Teczka do negatywów; Pojemniki na negatywy; Segregator przesuwny; Pudło przesuwne; Karuzela do slajdów; Teczka na slajdy; Strony przechowywania slajdów; Pojemnik na slajdy; Inne
ja: ネガ/スライドの保管方法: アーカイブ保管ボックス; ネガバインダー; ネガケース; ネガファイル; ネガティブスリーブ; スライドバインダー; スライドボックス; スライドカルーセル; スライドファイル; スライドストレージページ; スライドトレイ; その他
sk-SK: Typ úložiska negatívu/snímky: Archivovací úložný box; Zakladač na negatívy; Obálka na negatívy; Súbor na negatívy; Obal na negatívy; Zakladač na snímky; Škatuľa na snímky; Premietačka snímok; Súbor na snímky; Stránky úložiska snímok; Zásobník na snímky; Iné
hu: Negatív/dia tárolástípusa: Archiváló tárolódoboz; Negatívrendező; Negatívtároló boríték; Negatívtartó; Negatívtartó tokok; Diarendező; Diadoboz; Diaválasztó; Diatartó; Diatároló lapok; Diatálca; Egyéb
zh-CN: 负片/幻灯片存储类型: 归档存储箱; 底片夹; 底片轮廓; 底片文件; 底片保护套; 幻灯片夹; 幻灯片盒; 幻灯片轮播; 幻灯片文件; 幻灯片存储页面; 幻灯片存储盘; 其他
el: Τύπος αποθήκευσης φωτογραφικών αρνητικών και διαφανειών: Κουτί αποθήκευσης αρχείου; Ντοσιέ αρνητικών; Φάκελος αρνητικών; Αρχείο αρνητικών; Θήκες αρνητικών; Ντοσιέ διαφανειών; Κουτί διαφανειών; Καρουζέλ διαφανειών; Αρχείο διαφανειών; Σελίδες αποθήκευσης διαφανειών; Δίσκος διαφανειών; Άλλο